Utah statutes.
72-10-106.   Enforcement of chapter -- Fees for services by division.

(1) (a)  The division and every county and municipal officer required to enforce state laws shall enforce and assist in the enforcement of this chapter.

(b)  The division may enforce this chapter by injunction in the district courts of this state.

(c)  Other departments and political subdivisions of this state may cooperate with the department and the division in the development of aeronautics within this state.

(2) (a)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, the division may adopt a schedule of fees assessed for services provided by the division.

(b)  Each fee shall be reasonable and fair, and shall reflect the cost of the service provided.

(c)  Each fee established in this manner shall be submitted to and approved by the Legislature as part of the division's annual appropriations request.

(d)  The division may not charge or collect any fee proposed in this manner without approval by the Legislature.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 365, 1998 General Session

